Iowa, session 2025-2026, HF813.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE GENERAL ASSEMBLY OF THE STATE OF IOWA: 3 TLSB 1172YH (5) 91 dg/ko H.F. 813 Section 1. NEW SECTION . 135C.35D Nursing facilities ââ 1 private pay per diem rates. 2 1. For purposes of this section, âper diem rateâ means 3 the daily rate a nursing facility charges a private pay 4 individual to reside in the nursing facility pursuant to a 5 contract executed by the nursing facility and the private pay 6 individual. 7 2. a. A nursing facility shall not increase a per diem 8 rate by a percentage greater than the percentage change in 9 the consumer price index for all urban consumers for the last 10 available twelve-month period published in the federal register 11 by the federal bureau of labor statistics. 12 b. A nursing facility shall not increase the per diem rate 13 for at least twelve consecutive months from the date the per 14 diem rate was established. 15 c. A nursing facility shall not increase the per diem rate 16 more than one time in any consecutive twelve-month period. 17 3. A nursing facility not in compliance with this section 18 shall not be eligible to renew a license under this chapter. 19 4. The department shall implement rules pursuant to chapter 20 17A to implement this section. Rules shall include but not be 21 limited to a requirement that each nursing facility submit a 22 list of each per diem rate charged by the nursing facility to 23 the department on an annual basis. Each nursing facility shall 24 provide the information to the department in a format approved 25 by the department that does not disclose the identity of any 26 private pay individual. 27 5. This section applies to per diem rates that are 28 established or renewed on or after the effective date of this 29 Act. 30